California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
(c) The Controller shall allocate funds to local jurisdictions to support juvenile probation activities according to the following schedule: Alameda County3.9522%Alpine County0.0004%Amador County0.0597%Butte County0.3193%Calaveras County0.0611%Colusa County0.0341%Contra Costa County2.6634%Del Norte County0.1170%El Dorado County0.3016%Fresno County2.1547%Glenn County0.0536%Humboldt County0.1696%Imperial County0.3393%Inyo
 County0.1432%Kern County2.5687%Kings County0.3839%Lake County0.1866%Lassen County0.0543%Los Angeles County40.1353%Madera County0.2399%Marin County0.3742%Mariposa County0.0133%Mendocino County0.1975%Merced County0.3464%Modoc County0.0213%Mono County0.0071%Monterey County0.6039%Napa County0.3520%Nevada County0.1244%Orange County8.4582%Placer County0.2667%Plumas County0.0273%Riverside County3.2234%Sacramento County2.1350%San Benito County0.2136%San Bernardino County3.4715%San Diego County5.6095%San Francisco County1.9161%San Joaquin County0.8854%San Luis Obispo County0.6007%San Mateo County1.8974%Santa Barbara County1.6561%Santa Clara County5.8082%Santa Cruz County0.6128%Shasta County0.4116%Sierra County0.0037%Siskiyou County0.0750%Solano County1.0363%Sonoma County1.3043%Stanislaus County0.5275%Sutter County0.1344%Tehama County0.1444%Trinity County0.0346%Tulare County1.4116%Tuolumne County0.0706%Ventura County1.7193%Yolo County0.2543%Yuba County0.1125%

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 360, Sec. 13.   (SB 100)   Effective September 26, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

18220.1.

(a) For the 2011–12 fiscal year, the Controller shall, on a quarterly basis beginning October 1, allocate 6.47 percent of the funds deposited in the Local Law Enforcement Services Account in the Local Revenue Fund 2011 pursuant to a schedule provided by the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation. The department’s schedule shall provide for the allocation of funds appropriated in the annual Budget Act, and included in the Local Law Enforcement Services Account, among counties that operate juvenile camps and ranches based on the number of occupied beds in each camp as of 12:01 a.m. each day, up to the Corrections Standards Authority rated maximum capacity, as determined by the Corrections Standards Authority.

(b) Commencing with the 2012–13 fiscal year,
 subsequent to the allocation described in subdivision (c) of Section 29552 of the Government Code, the Controller shall allocate 6.46955375 percent of the remaining funds deposited in the Enhancing Law Enforcement Activities Subaccount in the Local Revenue Fund 2011 pursuant to the schedule provided by the Department of Finance based on data reported to the Board of State and Community Corrections. The schedule shall provide for the allocation of funds appropriated in the annual Budget Act, and included in the Enhancing Law Enforcement Activities Subaccount, among counties that operate juvenile camps and ranches based on the number of occupied beds in each camp as of 12:01 a.m. each day, up to the rated maximum capacity, as determined by the board. Allocations shall be made following the end of each fiscal quarter, beginning July 1, 2012, to account for beds occupied in that quarter.

(c) Commencing with the 2013–14 fiscal year, subsequent to
 the allocation described in subdivision (d) of Section 29552 of the Government Code, the Controller shall allocate 6.46955375 percent of the remaining funds deposited in the Enhancing Law Enforcement Activities Subaccount in the Local Revenue Fund 2011 pursuant to the schedule provided by the Department of Finance based on data reported to the Board of State and Community Corrections. The schedule shall provide for the allocation of funds appropriated in the annual Budget Act, and included in the Enhancing Law Enforcement Activities Subaccount, among counties that operate juvenile camps and ranches based on the number of occupied beds in each camp as of 12:01 a.m. each day, up to the rated maximum capacity, as determined by the board. Allocations shall be made in monthly installments.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 360, Sec. 14.   (SB 100)   Effective September 26, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

18221.

(a) Subject to the availability of funds for the purposes described in this section, funds provided pursuant to Section 18220 may be used to serve children who are habitual truants, runaways, at risk of being wards of the court under Section 601 or 602, or under juvenile court supervision or supervision of the probation department. Funds may be used to serve parents or other family members of these children if serving them will promote increased self-sufficiency, personal responsibility, and family stability for the child. Services shall be provided pursuant to a family service plan. When a family is served by multiple public agencies or in need of services from multiple public agencies, the family service plan shall be developed through an interdisciplinary approach that shall include representatives from agencies that provide services to the family or that may be required to implement the service plan.

(b) Services authorized under this section include all of the following:

(1) Educational advocacy and attendance monitoring.

(2) Mental health assessment and counseling.

(3) Home detention.

(4) Social responsibility training.

(5) Family mentoring.

(6) Parent peer support.

(7) Life skills counseling.

(8) Direct provision of, and referral to, prevocational and vocational training.

(9) Family crisis intervention.

(10) Individual, family, and group counseling.

(11) Parenting skills development.

(12) Drug and alcohol education.

(13) Respite care.

(14) Counseling, monitoring, and treatment.

(15) Gang intervention.

(16) Sex and health education.

(17) Anger management, violence prevention, and conflict resolution.

(18) Aftercare services as juveniles transition back into the community and reintegrate into their families.

(19) Information and referral regarding the availability of community services.

(20) Case management.

(21) Therapeutic day treatment.

(22) Transportation related to any of the services described in this subdivision.

(23) Emergency and temporary shelter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, 3rd Ex. Sess., Ch. 4, Sec. 29.   Effective February 20, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3.3. CalWORKs Demonstration Projects [18230. - 18247.]



  ARTICLE 1. County Welfare-to-Work Demonstration Projects [18230. - 18235.]

18230.

Pursuant to this chapter and Article 1 (commencing with Section 18200) of Chapter 3, the director may approve county demonstration projects for the CalWORKs program. Any project approved by the director that requires the expenditure of state or federal funds shall be subject to appropriation in the annual Budget Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 270, Sec. 181.   Effective August 11, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998, by Sec. 183 of Ch. 270.)
-------------------------------------------

18231.

(a) A county, or two or more counties, may implement three-year performance-based CalWORKs demonstration projects under this chapter to test alternative methods of service delivery designed to do any of, but not limited to, the following:

(1) More effectively serve highly distressed geographic areas.

(2) More effectively serve hard-to-employ target populations.

(3) Better meet local labor force demands.

(4) Address the needs of the CalWORKs population in areas of chronic high unemployment.

(5) Improve administration of program services to clients.

(b) It is the intent of the Legislature that CalWORKs demonstration projects promote cross-agency collaboration within the county or counties in order to reduce duplication and fragmentation of services, serve CalWORKs families in a comprehensive fashion, and increase the self-sufficiency and well-being of CalWORKs families.

(c) It is the intent of the Legislature that each demonstration project test different types of alternative service delivery or serve different types of populations.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 270, Sec. 181.   Effective August 11, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998, by Sec. 183 of Ch. 270.)
-------------------------------------------

18232.

(a) A county board of supervisors that wishes to demonstrate an alternative method of CalWORKs service delivery shall apply to the director for approval of its demonstration project. The county application shall identify the specific goals of the project, how it plans to attain those goals, and the evaluation methodology and funding source that will be used to evaluate the extent to which the goals are attained. The application shall also include a description of the process through which the proposal was developed, which shall include participation by representatives of all the stakeholders who will potentially be affected by the project, including representatives of CalWORKs recipients, service providers, and all relevant local government agencies. Prior to receiving approval for a demonstration project, the applicant county shall demonstrate to the director agreement from all parties described in the application who will be involved in implementing the project.

(b) A participating county shall abide by all audit requirements necessary to ensure compliance with federal law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 270, Sec. 181.   Effective August 11, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998, by Sec. 183 of Ch. 270.)
-------------------------------------------

18233.

Before authorizing a demonstration project, the director shall ensure that it is consistent with the intent of state CalWORKs law. At least 30 days prior to approving a demonstration project, the director shall provide written notice to the chairperson of the relevant policy committees of each house of the Legislature and the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee. The notice shall identify any increased state costs that will result from the project.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 270, Sec. 181.   Effective August 11, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998, by Sec. 183 of Ch. 270.)
-------------------------------------------

18234.

(a) Except as otherwise provided in this section, a county’s CalWORKs demonstration project shall not be exempt from state law that governs eligibility, unless a county wishes to extend eligibility to families not otherwise covered, in a manner that is consistent with applicable federal laws and regulations.

(b) A county may not reduce grant levels below the level established pursuant to Section 11450, but may supplement grant levels established in state law, and may extend time limits, using county only funds.

(c) A county’s CalWORKs demonstration project may not be exempt from state law that governs any of the following:

(1) Dispute resolution procedures and penalties, including fair hearings.

(2) Recipient confidentiality.

(3) Child support collection.

(4) County contracting.

(5) Collective bargaining law and agreements.

(6) Civil service procedures.

(7) Fair labor standards.

(8) Displacement of current workers.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 270, Sec. 181.   Effective August 11, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998, by Sec. 183 of Ch. 270.)
-------------------------------------------

18235.

A demonstration project under this article shall include a range of services designed to assist recipients to achieve employment, which may not include job search and work experience to the exclusion of other activities that may be required by the population in the project, and the supportive services necessary for clients to achieve self-sufficiency, which at a minimum shall include child care, transportation, mental health treatment, and substance abuse treatment. A demonstration project shall not result in a diminution in the level of funding for services that would be available if the project were not implemented.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 270, Sec. 181.   Effective August 11, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998, by Sec. 183 of Ch. 270.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. School Attendance Demonstration Projects [18236. - 18237.]

18236.

(a) The director may approve school attendance demonstration projects in San Diego and Merced Counties, at the option of each county, to demonstrate means of increasing school attendance and graduation rates of children or teens who receive benefits under the CalWORKs program. The project shall emphasize a social service approach to children and families who are experiencing truancy problems, and shall include collaboration with the academic community to support a successful school experience. Families shall be provided a range of services, resources, and tools to assist them in coping with issues related to their children’s school problems. These shall include integrated services involving the county and the appropriate school districts. After all other avenues to encourage a student to
 attend school have been exhausted and a family has failed to correct the truancy of a child in the family unit, a participating county may reduce a family grant by the amount of the truant child’s portion grant. The full grant shall be replaced upon a showing that the student has attended school full-time for one month or has otherwise cooperated with an education or training plan developed with the county and the school district.

(b) Participating counties shall measure their success in achieving the following outcomes:

(1) Increased attendance and graduation.

(2) Decreased truancy.

(3) Higher grade point averages.

(4) Increased ADA.

(5) Decreased dropout rates.

(6) Increased collaboration among agencies providing services for children.

(7) Reinforcement of parental responsibility.

(c) Prior to being selected as a demonstration project site, the governing board of each school district shall approve the project and a clear delineation of the county’s and the school or school district’s responsibilities shall be established in a memorandum of understanding.

(d) Each county shall identify how it plans to attain the goals of the demonstration project and the evaluation methodology and funding source that will be used to evaluate the extent to which the goals are attained.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 27, Sec. 116.   (SB 80)   Effective June 27, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

18237.

(a) The department, in conjunction with the State Department of Education and the Attorney General, may evaluate the effectiveness of one program, as described in this section in a county that chooses to operate such a program.

(b) The truancy coordinator in the district attorney’s office shall provide assistance to school districts to address cases of habitual truancy as defined in Section 48262 of the Education Code.

(c) The county truancy coordinator shall perform, at a minimum, all of the following duties:

(1) Represent the district attorney on the county school attendance review board pursuant to Section 48321 of the Education Code.

(2) Prepare letters as requested by local school districts that provide a warning notice to parents of truant pupils subject to criminal prosecution and penalties pursuant to Section 48293 of the Education Code.

(3) Develop a district truancy mediation program, as defined in Section 48263.5 of the Education Code, unless the county probation department has elected to provide the program.

(d) The school attendance review board shall assist the district attorney and the court in ensuring that every parent or guardian and truant pupil prosecuted and convicted under Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 48200) of Part 2 of the Education Code, complies with the sentence of the court, including, but not limited to, collection of fines, ensuring the performance of community service and providing certification of school attendance.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 270, Sec. 181.   Effective August 11, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998, by Sec. 183 of Ch. 270.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Microenterprise Demonstration Projects [18238. - 18239.]

18238.

For the purposes of this article:

(a) “Microenterprise” means a small business in which a participant works as his or her own employer.

(b) “Microenterprise assistance provider” means a public agency or a nonprofit agency meeting the requirements of Section 501(c)(3) of the federal Internal Revenue Code, that is exempt from taxation under Section 501(a) of the Internal Revenue Code, and that provides self-employment training, technical assistance, and access to microloans to individuals seeking to become self-employed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 270, Sec. 181.   Effective August 11, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998, by Sec. 183 of Ch. 270.)
-------------------------------------------

18239.

(a) With the consent of participating counties, the department may implement demonstration projects to provide self-employment training and technical assistance to recipients of CalWORKs benefits and persons who are at risk of receiving CalWORKs benefits. Each demonstration project shall operate for three years. At least one demonstration project shall operate in Los Angeles County and at least one in a northern California county. The number of demonstration projects shall be limited to no more than six. However, if nonstate matching funds become available, the number shall be limited to no more than 12.

(b) The self-employment training shall include development of a viable business plan, assisting the recipient to determine if self-employment is suitable to the recipient’s aptitudes and family dependent care obligations, marketing strategies, business location analysis, direct technical assistance in the development of a microenterprise, and other subjects as necessary to achieve proficiency in basic business skills. The training shall include periodic assistance or case management, as needed, for up to one year after the recipient’s self-employment has commenced.

(c) To ensure communication and collaboration between county welfare departments, including CalWORKs programs, and microenterprise assistance providers, proposals to operate demonstration projects under this article shall be jointly submitted by local microenterprise service providers and the county welfare department. No county matching funds shall be required for the implementation and evaluation of the demonstration project. Local microenterprise assistance providers participating in the pilot project shall have at least two years’ experience and demonstrated success in providing assistance to recipients of CalWORKs benefits and other low-income individuals to create their own jobs through self-employment.

(d) If pursuant to subdivision (a), the department, with the consent of participating counties, chooses to implement a microenterprise demonstration project, the department shall solicit proposals from microenterprise assistance providers seeking to administer a demonstration project under this article on a not-for-profit basis. The department shall seek to encourage financial participation of private entities for purposes of including more individuals in these demonstration projects.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 270, Sec. 181.   Effective August 11, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998, by Sec. 183 of Ch. 270.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Child Support Assurance Demonstration Project [18241. - 18247.]

18241.

It is the intent of the Legislature, in implementing federal welfare reform, to create a Child Support Assurance Demonstration Project that is consistent with the Personal Responsibility and Work Opportunity Reconciliation Act of 1996 (P.L. 104-193) and that maximizes cost effectiveness while lifting children out of poverty. It is the intent of the Legislature that the program will secure financial stability for California’s children through a guaranteed minimum level of financial support for the children of participating families, while at the same time encouraging custodial parents to be employed and noncustodial parents to financially support their children.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 270, Sec. 181.   Effective August 11, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998, by Sec. 183 of Ch. 270.)
-------------------------------------------

18242.

(a) Upon application by a county board of supervisors, the department may approve up to three demonstration projects to test models of child support assurance. The projects shall either test different models of child support assurance or may test the same model if counties in which the same model is tested involve counties with different demographics.

(b) The department may approve joint projects by two or more counties if both of the following apply:

(1) The equity of access to the project and its related services is ensured to all participants.

(2) The project includes appropriate operational and fiscal arrangements between the counties submitting the joint project.

(c) If the department approves a joint project by two or more counties, that joint project shall constitute one of the projects authorized by subdivision (a).

(d) It is the intent of the Legislature that the purpose of the demonstration projects authorized by this article is to test child support assurance models as alternatives to welfare under which families with earnings and a child support order receive a guaranteed child support payment, in lieu of a grant under the CalWORKs program, from funds continuously appropriated for the CalWORKs program.

(e) A county may limit the number of families that will be permitted to enroll in its child support assurance demonstration program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 803, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

18243.

The department shall develop research designs to ensure thorough evaluations of the child support assurance demonstration projects that shall include, but not be limited to, the impact of the project on work participation rates of custodial parents, household incomes and family well-being, CalWORKs participation rates and costs, rates of paternity and child support order establishment, and any other relevant information the director may require.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 803, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

18244.

(a) A family shall be eligible to participate in the project described in Section 18246 only if, at the time of application to participate in the child assurance program, the family is receiving, or has been determined to be eligible to receive, an aid grant under Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 11200) of Part 3.

(b) A family’s participation under this article shall not affect its eligibility to receive Medi-Cal and child care benefits under Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 11200) of Part 3, if otherwise eligible.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 902, Sec. 58.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

18245.

(a) A family shall be eligible to receive a child support assurance payment on behalf of a child only if the child’s custodial parent has done all of the following:

(1) Assigned the child’s right to collect child support to the state.

(2) Established paternity, obtained a child support order, and is using the services available under the state plan approved under Part D (commencing with Section 651) of Chapter 7 of Title 42 of the United States Code.

(3) Opted to participate in the child assurance program in lieu of cash assistance under Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 11200) or its successor program.

(b) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2), as a condition of receiving a child support assurance payment under this article, a custodial parent shall also be required to do both of the following:

(A) Continue to provide all other relevant information that the applicant has that may be requested by the county.

(B) Appear at required interviews, conference hearings, or legal proceedings, if notified in advance and an illness or emergency does not prevent attendance.

(2) A custodial parent shall not be required to comply with paragraph (1) when compliance would make it more difficult for a domestic violence victim to escape physical abuse or when cooperation would increase the risk of further violence or unfairly penalize the victim.

(c) In order to be eligible under this article, a child shall meet all of the following conditions:

(1) The child resides in the county.

(2) The child has a noncustodial parent living in the United States, or if not living in the United States, is subject to service of process by a state or territory of the United States.

(3) The child is under 18 years of age or, if enrolled in high school, under 19 years of age.

(4) The custodial parent is employed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 902, Sec. 59.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

18247.

(a) The state share of child support assurance payments under this article shall be paid in accordance with Section 15200.

(b) The department shall, to the extent possible, ensure that no funding streams will be utilized to pay for child support assurance payments if the use of the funding streams would cause participants to be subject to the limitations of Section 11454 or any similar limitation.

(c) The county administrative cost for the operation of a child support assurance program shall be paid from the county’s allocation provided under Sections 15204.2 and 15204.3.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 803, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. County Wraparound Services Program [18250. - 18258.]

18250.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature that all counties be authorized to provide children with service alternatives to out-of-home care through the development of expanded family-based services programs. These programs shall include individualized or “wraparound” services, where services are wrapped around a child living with his or her birth parent, relative, nonrelative extended family member as defined in Section 362.7, adoptive parent, licensed or certified foster parent, resource family, or guardian. The wraparound services developed under this section shall build on the strengths of each eligible child and family and be tailored to address their unique and changing needs.

(b) It is further the intent of the Legislature that the county wraparound services program include the following elements:

(1) Enabling the county to access all possible sources of federal funds for the purpose of developing family-based service alternatives.

(2) Encouraging collaboration among persons and entities including, but not limited to, parents, county welfare departments, county mental health departments, county probation departments, county health departments, special education local planning agencies, school districts, and private service providers for the purpose of planning and providing individualized services for children and their birth or substitute families.

(3) Ensuring local community
 participation in the development and implementation of wraparound services by county placing or referring agencies and service providers.

(4) Preserving and using the service resources and expertise of nonprofit providers to develop family-based and community-based service alternatives.

(c) Beginning in the 2011–12 fiscal year, and for each fiscal year thereafter, funding and expenditures for programs and activities under this section shall be in accordance with the requirements provided in Sections 30025 and 30026.5 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 732, Sec. 122.   (AB 404)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

18251.

As used in this chapter:

(a) “County” means each county participating in an individualized or wraparound services program.

(b) “County placing or referring agency” means a county welfare or probation department, or a county mental health department.

(c) “Eligible child” means a child or nonminor dependent, as described in subdivision (v) of Section 11400, who is any of the following:

(1) A child or nonminor dependent who has been adjudicated as either a dependent, transition dependent, or ward of the juvenile court
 pursuant to Section 300, 450, 601, or 602.

(2) A child who is the subject of a petition filed pursuant to Section 602 and who is participating in a program described in Section 654.2, 725, or 790, and is at risk of placement in out-of-home care.

(3) A child or nonminor dependent who is currently, or who would be, placed in out-of-home care.

(4) A child who is eligible for adoption assistance program benefits when the responsible public agency has approved the provision of wraparound services in lieu of out-of-home care.

(d) “Wraparound services” means community-based intervention services that emphasize the strengths of the child and family and includes the
 delivery of coordinated, highly individualized unconditional services to address needs and achieve positive outcomes in their lives.

(e) “Service allocation slot” means a specified amount of funds available to the county to pay for an individualized intensive wraparound services package for an eligible child. A service allocation slot may be used for more than one child on a successive basis.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 732, Sec. 123.   (AB 404)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

18252.

Each county shall, at the county’s option, develop a county plan for intensive wrap-around services and monitor the provision of those services in accordance with the plan. This plan shall be submitted to the department for informational purposes. Where a county operates both systems of care under the Children’s Mental Health Services Act, Part 4 (commencing with Section 5850) of Division 5, and wrap-around services, these plans shall be coordinated. Each county’s plan shall include all the following elements:

(a) A process and protocol for reviewing the eligibility of children and families for service and for monitoring accessibility and availability of service to the targeted population. Children shall be determined as eligible for wrap-around services pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 18251, except that:

(1) Once a child is determined to be eligible for wrap-around services under this chapter, he or she shall remain eligible for the time period specified in his or her individualized services plan.

(2) A child and family participating in a family maintenance services program as described in Section 16506 and the wrap-around services program, shall not be subject to the time limitations specified in Section 16506.

(b) A process to accept, modify, or deny proposed individualized service plans for eligible children and families.

(c) A process for parent support, mentoring, and advocacy that ensures parent understanding of, and participation in, wrap-around services programs.

(d) A planning and review process to support and facilitate the following principles in delivering intensive wrap-around services to eligible children and families:

(1) Focusing on an individual child and family through the creation of service plans designed specifically to address the unique needs and strengths of each child and his or her family.

(2) Providing services geared toward enabling children to remain in the least restrictive, most family-like setting possible.

(3) Developing a close collaborative relationship with each child’s family in the planning and provision of wrap-around services.

(4) Conducting a thorough, strengths-based assessment of each child and family that will form the basis for the development of the individualized intervention plan.

(5) Designing and delivering services that incorporate the religious customs, and regional, racial, and ethnic values and beliefs of the children and families served.

(6) Measuring consumer satisfaction to assess outcomes.

(e) Written interagency agreements or memorandums of understanding between the county departments of mental health, social services, and probation that specify jointly provided or integrated services, staff tasks and responsibilities, facility and supply commitments, budget considerations, and linkage and referral services.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 795, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

18253.

Each county shall ensure that an evaluation of the wraparound services program is conducted to determine the cost and treatment effectiveness of outcomes such as family functioning and social performance, preventing placement in more restrictive environments, improving emotional and behavioral adjustments, school attendance, and stability in the least restrictive school placement for eligible children. Systems of care outcomes shall be included to the extent they are applicable to the target population.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 561, Sec. 4.   (AB 1758)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

18253.5.

Each county shall ensure that staff participating in the wraparound services program have completed training provided or approved by the department, on providing individualized wraparound services.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 561, Sec. 5.   (AB 1758)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

18254.

(a) Retroactive to January 1, 2017, the rate for wraparound services, under the county optional wraparound services program, shall be equal to the rate for short-term residential therapeutic programs established pursuant to Section 11462, less the cost of any concurrent out-of-home placement.

(b) For each fiscal year, funding and expenditures for programs and activities under this section shall be in accordance with the requirements provided in Sections 30025 and 30026.5 of the Government Code.

(c) County and federal foster care funds, to the extent permitted by federal law, shall remain with the administrative authority of the county, which may enter into an interagency agreement to transfer those
 funds, and shall be used to provide intensive wraparound services.

(d) Costs for the provision of benefits to eligible children, at rates authorized by subdivision (a), through the wraparound services program authorized by this chapter, shall not exceed the costs that otherwise would have been incurred had the eligible children been placed in a short-term residential therapeutic program.

(e) Commencing July 1, 2017, and each July 1 thereafter, an annual cost-of-living increase shall be applied to the wraparound rate, subject to the availability of county funds, equal to the California Necessities Index used in the preparation of the May Revision for the current fiscal year.

(f) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2017.

(g) Effective on July 1, 2027, or the date required by paragraph (9) of subdivision (h) of Section 11461, whichever is later, the rate for wraparound services, under the county optional wraparound services program, shall be equal to the sum of the Tier 3+ Care and Supervision rate established under paragraph (3) of subdivision (h) of Section 11461 and the Tier 3+ administrative rate established under paragraph (2) of subdivision (e) of Section 11462. All other provisions of this section shall continue to apply.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 46, Sec. 54.   (AB 161)   Effective July 2, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

18256.

The department shall work with the County Welfare Directors Association of California to identify periodic data elements to be collected in order to track the impact of the counties’ wraparound services programs on applicable California Child and Family Services Review System outcome indicators, such as safety, permanency, and the well-being of the child.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 561, Sec. 9.   (AB 1758)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

18256.5.

In order to prevent disruption to a child participating in a wraparound services program, any county that terminates its wraparound services program shall ensure the participating child’s service needs are met without disruption until his or her case is closed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 561, Sec. 10.   (AB 1758)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

18257.

The State Department of Social Services shall seek applicable federal approval to make the maximum number of children being served through such programs eligible for federal financial participation and amend any applicable state regulations to the extent necessary to eliminate any limitations on the numbers of children who can participate in these programs.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 35, Sec. 147.   (SB 1013)   Effective June 27, 2012.   Note: This section was added on Nov. 2, 2004, by initiative Prop. 63.)
-------------------------------------------

18257.5.

The State Department of Social Services and the State Department of Health Care Services, in consultation with county representatives and other stakeholders, shall develop recommendations for implementing and expanding high-fidelity wraparound services statewide. The departments shall complete these activities no later than one year from the enactment of this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 86, Sec. 55.   (AB 153)   Effective July 16, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

18258.

(a) A child who is categorically eligible for
 Medi-Cal benefits pursuant to Section 1396a(a)(10)(A)(i)(I) of Title 42 of the United States Code shall remain eligible for Medi-Cal benefits so long as foster care maintenance payments under Title IV-E of the federal Social Security Act are made on the child’s behalf. Placement at home without a change in the child’s status as an adjudicated dependent or ward of the juvenile court shall not be cause for a redetermination unless necessary to obtain federal financial participation for Medi-Cal.

(b) A child who is eligible for Medi-Cal benefits, but is not described in subdivision (a), shall remain eligible for benefits subject to annual Medi-Cal redetermination pursuant to Section 14012. Placement at home without a change in the child’s status as an adjudicated dependent or ward of the juvenile court shall not be cause for a redetermination unless necessary to obtain federal
 financial participation for Medi-Cal.

(c) Medi-Cal eligibility for a child receiving wraparound services pursuant to this chapter shall be determined in accordance with the standards, methodologies, and procedures outlined in Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 14000) of Part 3 of Division 9.

(d) This section is declaratory of existing law.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 561, Sec. 11.   (AB 1758)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4.3. Sexually Exploited Minors Program [18259. - 18259.3.]

18259.

(a) The County of Alameda, contingent upon local funding, may establish a project consistent with this chapter to develop a comprehensive, replicative, multidisciplinary model to address the needs and effective treatment of commercially sexually exploited minors who have been arrested or detained by local law enforcement for a violation of subdivision (a) or (b) of Section 647 or subdivision (a) of former Section 653.22 of the Penal Code, or who have been adjudged a dependent of the juvenile court pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 300.
